Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Building Fund

§ 18-4-201.
Election for establishment; mill levy; custodian; restriction on use; investment.

Each board of county commissioners may by resolution provide for an election to decide whether a building fund of a specified amount to be raised within a specified time not exceeding ten (10) years, should be accumulated to erect, add to or improve county buildings. After the resolution has been made the proposal shall be submitted on a separate ballot to the qualified electors of the county, at an election called, conducted, canvassed and returned in the manner provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. The ballot shall set forth in concise language the purpose for establishing the building fund and shall permit each voter to vote “For the establishment of a building fund” or “Against the establishment of a building fund”. If a majority is in favor of the proposal to establish the building fund the proposal carries, and if a majority is against the proposal it fails.

If the proposal carries the board of county commissioners may levy a tax to raise money directly for the building fund, providing this levy and other county levies do not exceed the constitutional limitation in addition:

The funds so raised shall be kept by the county treasurer until sufficient to commence the building, addition or improvement;

The building fund shall be held by the county treasurer for the purpose specified and shall not be used for any other purpose;

The county commissioners may invest these funds to realize the greatest amount of interest as provided by W.S.

9-4-831

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 203, §§ 1 to 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-239 to 18-243; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1994, ch. 19, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to elections generally, see title 22.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(iii), substituted “W.S.

9-4-831

” for “W.S. 9-612.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”